Washington statutes.
RCW 5.44.010

Court records and proceedings—When admissible.

The records and proceedings of any court of the United States, or any state or territory, or any federally recognized Indian tribe, are admissible in evidence in all cases in this state when duly certified by the attestation of the clerk, prothonotary or other officer having charge of the records of such court, with the seal of such court annexed.

[ 2019 c 39 s 1; 1997 c 358 s 7; Code 1881 s 430; 1877 p 94 s 432; 1869 p 115 s 426; 1854 p 195 s 334; RRS s 1254.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 44(a)(1).